Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,142
Motor vehicle theft or fraud; violation; penalty.

Any person violating any provision of sections 44-3,134 to 44-3,142 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 78, § 9.